Hawaii statutes.
§425E-1103 Articles of
conversion. (a) If a plan of conversion has been approved in accordance
with section 425E-1102 and has not been abandoned, articles of conversion shall
be executed by a partner, officer, or other duly authorized representative of
the converting entity and shall set forth:

(1) A statement certifying the following:

(A) The name, entity type, and state or
country of incorporation, formation, or organization of the converting and
converted entities;

(B) That a plan of conversion has been
approved in accordance with section 425E-1102;

(C) That an executed plan of conversion is on
file at the principal place of business of the converting entity and stating
the address thereof; and

(D) That a copy of the plan of conversion
shall be furnished by the converting entity prior to the conversion or the
converted entity after the conversion, on written request and without cost, to
any limited partner of the converting entity or the converted entity; and

(2) A statement that the approval of the plan of
conversion was duly authorized by all action required by the laws under which
the converting entity was incorporated, formed, or organized.

(b) The articles of conversion shall be
delivered to the director for filing.

(c) The converted entity, if a domestic
corporation, domestic professional corporation, domestic nonprofit corporation,
domestic general partnership, domestic limited partnership, or domestic limited
liability company shall attach a copy of its respective registration documents
to the articles of conversion. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1; am L 2009, c 23, §12]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next